Maine, session 132, LD1277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §7246, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 544, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Controlled substance. "Controlled substance" means a controlled substance
included in schedules II, III, IV or V of 21 United States Code, Section 812 or 21 Code of
Federal Regulations, Section 1308, except anabolic steroids.
Sec. 2. Information concerning anabolic steroids. Immediately upon the
effective date of this Act, the Department of Health and Human Services shall purge from
the records of the Controlled Substances Prescription Monitoring Program, as established
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 7248, all existing information concerning
the prescribing and dispensing of anabolic steroids.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding for database maintenance to implement the exception of
anabolic steroids from the Controlled Substances Prescription Monitoring Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $62,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $62,000
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purge records from the Controlled Substances
Prescription Monitoring Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $15,000
Page 1 - 132LR2127(05)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $15,000
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $77,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $77,000
Page 2 - 132LR2127(05)